Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5760YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2045 Section 1. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE ââ INFRASTRUCTURE 1 COST RECOVERY ââ STUDY. The office of consumer advocate 2 shall conduct a study to examine whether any rate-regulated 3 public utility is charging Iowa customers for infrastructure 4 improvements that benefit residents of other states. If 5 it is found that Iowa customers are being charged for such 6 infrastructure improvements, the office of consumer advocate 7 shall determine if the public utilityâs customers in the state 8 of Iowa are being adequately compensated for the charges in 9 the customersâ utility bills. The office of consumer advocate 10 shall submit to the general assembly on or before December 31, 11 2026, a report detailing the officeâs findings. 12